Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-104.12 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State Department of Education shall prepare and adopt a
comprehensive four-year plan for the purpose of addressing the State
Department of Education's programming needs and development. Such
plan shall be a continuous plan, reviewed and updated annually.
B. The plan shall include, but not be limited to:
1. A statement of the State Department of Education's long-term
goals and short-term objectives for current and future programs;

ENGR. H. B. NO. 3029 Page 1

2. A description of proposed new programs, including how such
programs would operate;
3. An analysis of cost implications and measurement criteria
for current program needs and future program development; and
4. Specific action plans, target dates, strategies, and methods
of implementation for achieving the identified goals and objectives.
C. Before December 1 of each year, the comprehensive four-year
plan shall be submitted to the Governor, the Speaker of the Oklahoma
House of Representatives, and the President Pro Tempore of the
Oklahoma State Senate.
D. The State Department of Education shall promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective September 1, 2026.
Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate



ENGR. H. B. NO. 3029 Page 2